District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1512

Registration — Firms composed of public accounts.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-59, § 13, 24 DCR 5975
July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-38, § 80(e), 41 DCR 3010
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1234, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-112.
1973 Ed., § 2-952.

Editor's Notes

Revision of chapter: See note to § 3-1501.